Illinois, session 104th, HB1698.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-4.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-4.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-4.1)7    Sec. 11-4.1. (a) In appointing polling places under this 8Article, the county board or board of election commissioners 9shall, insofar as they are convenient and available, use 10schools and other public buildings as polling places.11    (b) Upon request of the county board or board of election 12commissioners, the proper agency of government (including 13school districts and units of local government) shall make a 14public building under its control available for use as a 15polling place on an election day and for a reasonably 16necessary time before and after election day, without charge. 17If the county board or board of election commissioners chooses 18a school to be a polling place, then the school district must 19make the school available for use as a polling place. Upon 20receiving the election authority's request, if a school 21district demonstrates to the election authority that the use 22of the school as a polling place would interfere with 23scheduled programming or pose a threat to the safety of staff   HB1698- 2 -LRB104 10021 SPS 20092 b1or students, the election authority and the school district 2shall work cooperatively to find an alternative location to 3serve as a polling place. If the school district and the 4election authority are unable to identify a mutually agreeable 5alternative location, the school district and the election 6authority shall submit a report to the Board of County 7Commissioners that includes:8        (1) previous voter turnout data at the proposed 9    polling place, including:10            (A) the percentage of early voters;11            (B) the percentage of vote-by-mail voters; and12            (C) the percentage of voters on election day;13        (2) a list of previous polling places within a 14    reasonable distance of the proposed polling place; and15        (3) a list of early polling places within a reasonable 16    distance of the proposed polling place.17    After receiving the report, the Board of County 18Commissioners shall determine a location to be used as a 19polling place as soon as practicable to avoid further delay in 20determining a polling place. 21    However, for the day of the election, a school district is 22encouraged to (i) close the school or (ii) hold a teachers 23institute on that day with students not in attendance.24    (c) A government agency which makes a public building 25under its control available for use as a polling place shall 26(i) ensure the portion of the building to be used as the   HB1698- 3 -LRB104 10021 SPS 20092 b1polling place is accessible to voters with disabilities and 2elderly voters and (ii) allow the election authority to 3administer the election as authorized under this Code.4    (d) If a qualified elector's precinct polling place is a 5school and the elector will be unable to enter that polling 6place without violating Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 72012 because the elector is a child sex offender as defined in 8Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, that elector may 9vote by a vote by mail ballot in accordance with Article 19 of 10this Code or may vote early in accordance with Article 19A of 11this Code.12(Source: P.A. 98-773, eff. 7-18-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 1399-143, eff. 7-27-15.)